Hawaii statutes.
[§11-355] Contributions by state and
county contractors prohibited. (a) It shall be unlawful for any person
who enters into any contract with the State, any of the counties, or any
department or agency thereof either for the rendition of personal services, the
buying of property, or furnishing of any material, supplies, or equipment to
the State, any of the counties, any department or agency thereof, or for
selling any land or building to the State, any of the counties, or any
department or agency thereof, if payment for the performance of the contract or
payment for material, supplies, equipment, land, property, or building is to be
made in whole or in part from funds appropriated by the legislative body, at
any time between the execution of the contract through the completion of the
contract, to:

(1) Directly or indirectly make any contribution, or
promise expressly or impliedly to make any contribution to any candidate
committee or noncandidate committee, or to any candidate or to any person for
any political purpose or use; or

(2) Knowingly solicit any contribution from any
person for any purpose during any period.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (a), this
section does not prohibit or make unlawful the establishment or administration
of, or the solicitation of contributions to, any noncandidate committee by any
person other than the state or county contractor for the purpose of influencing
the nomination for election, or the election of any person to office.

(c) For purposes of this section, "completion
of the contract" means that the parties to the government contract have
either terminated the contract prior to completion of performance or fully
performed the duties and obligations under the contract, no disputes relating
to the performance and payment remain under the contract, and all disputed
claims have been adjudicated and are final. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Hawaii's government-contractor ban on direct campaign
contributions set forth in this section was constitutional as applied to
plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor's proposed
contributions; given the public role of legislators and the power (or perceived
power) they can have in contractual matters, applying the contribution ban was
closely connected to the government interest in refuting at least the
perception of corruption in the electoral process; it functions to alleviate
even the appearance of a connection (a quid pro quo) between a government
contractor and a candidate for public office. 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023 (2012).

Plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor
had standing to challenge the contribution restrictions on government
contractors in this section, given that plaintiff was a government contractor,
had made substantial contributions to candidates in the past, and sought to
make future contributions while it was a contractor; moreover, plaintiff did
not have to violate the statute to challenge its terms, and a favorable ruling
would have allowed plaintiff to make contributions as a contractor without
violating the law. 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023 (2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next